Massachusetts, session 194th, H3717.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after subsection (b) the following subsections:
(c) All expenditures for maintaining, repairing, improving, and constructing municipal
ways and bridges, and other eligible municipal projects, made by the department in accordance
with subsection (b), shall be allocated by the commissioner to each municipality based upon the
following factors-
(i) The cost of resurfacing two percent of all municipally owned, but not state numbered,
roads within said municipality;
of 2

(ii) The cost of resurfacing three and three-tenths percent of all municipally owned and
maintained state numbered routes within said municipality.
(d) The match factor of the Municipal Match Program set forth in Chapter 90 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, for the purpose of maintaining,
repairing, improving, and constructing municipal ways and bridges, and other eligible municipal
projects, shall be determined by using the measure of aggregate property values and aggregate
personal income within each municipality, with each measure to be given equal weight.
(e) The maximum allowable match by the Commonwealth shall be two hundred percent
of the allocation put forth by a municipality, not to exceed said sum of local apportionment. The
minimum allowable match shall be twelve and a half percent of the allocation set forth by a
municipality, not to exceed said sum of local apportionment.
of 2